North Carolina, session 2025, HB941.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REVISE TEACHING FELLOWS PROGRAM
SECTION 1. Part 3 of Article 23 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes reads as
rewritten:
"Part 3. North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program.
"§ 116-209.60. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
…
(5a) Qualifying licensure area. – A teacher licensure area in one of the following
subjects:
a. Either of the following, as identified pursuant to G.S. 116-209.62(h):
1. Special education.
2. Stem.
b. Elementary education (K-6).
c. Middle Grades Language Arts.
*H941-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. Middle Grades Social Studies.
e. English (9-12).
f. Social Studies (9-12).
g. History (9-12).
…
"§ 116-209.62. North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program established; administration.
…
(b) Trust Fund. – There is established the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Program
Trust Fund to be administered by the Authority, in conjunction with the System Office of The
University of North Carolina. All funds (i) appropriated to, or otherwise received by, the Program
for forgivable loans and other Program purposes, (ii) received as repayment of forgivable loans,
and (iii) earned as interest on these funds shall be placed in the Trust Fund. The purpose of the
Trust Fund is to provide financial assistance to qualified students for completion of teacher
education and licensure programs to fill teach in qualifying licensure areas in the public schools
of the State.
(c) Uses of Monies in the Trust Fund. – The monies in the Trust Fund may be used only
for (i) forgivable loans granted under the Program, (ii) administrative costs associated with the
Program, including recruitment and recovery of funds advanced under the Program, (iii)
mentoring and coaching support to forgivable loan recipients, and (iv) extracurricular
enhancement activities of the Program in accordance with the following:
(1) The Authority shall transfer the greater of six hundred thousand dollars
($600,000) or ten percent (10%) the following amounts of the available funds
from the Trust Fund to The University of North Carolina System Office at the
beginning of each fiscal year year:
a. The greater of six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) or ten percent
(10%) for the Program's administrative costs, the salary of the Director
of the Program and other Program staff, expenses of the Commission,
and to provide the Commission with funds to use for the
extracurricular enhancement activities of the Program.staff, and
expenses of the Commission.
b. The sum of up to six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) for
extracurricular enhancement activities of the Program, including (i)
summer programs to maintain year-round connections and (ii) alumni
programs to foster continued engagement after graduation. These
activities should be geared to instilling a strong motivation not only to
remain in teaching but to provide leadership for tomorrow's schools.
c. The sum of up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for the
Director of the Program to implement the recruitment activities
identified in subsection (d) of this section.
…
(f) Program Selection Criteria. – The Authority shall administer the Program in
cooperation with up to 10 14 institutions of higher education with approved educator preparation
programs selected by the Commission that represent a diverse selection of both postsecondary
constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and private postsecondary
institutions operating in the State. The Commission shall adopt stringent standards for selection
of the most effective educator preparation programs, including the following:
(1) Demonstrates high rates of educator effectiveness on value-added models and
teacher evaluations, including using performance-based, subject-specific
assessment and support systems, such as edTPA or other metrics of evaluating
candidate effectiveness that have predictive validity.
Page 2 House Bill 941-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Demonstrates measurable impact of prior graduates on student learning,
including impact of graduates teaching in qualifying licensure areas.
(3) Demonstrates high rates of graduates passing exams required for teacher
licensure.
(4) Provides curricular and co-curricular enhancements in leadership, facilitates
learning for diverse learners, and promotes community engagement,
classroom management, and reflection and assessment.
(5) Requires at least a minor concentration of study in the subject area that the
candidate may teach.
(6) Provides early and frequent internship or practical experiences, including the
opportunity for participants to perform practicums in diverse school
environments.
(7) Is approved by the State Board of Education as an educator preparation
program.
(8) For an educator preparation program enrolling loan recipients in a program of
study leading to licensure in elementary education (K-6), provides training
that is aligned with the Science of Reading in accordance with
G.S. 115C-269.20. The Commission shall contract with a third-party entity to
biennially evaluate whether a program identified in this subdivision is
providing training that is aligned with the Science of Reading.
(g) Awards of Forgivable Loans. – The Program shall provide forgivable loans to selected
students to be used at up to 10 14 selected institutions for completion of a program leading to
initial teacher licensure as follows:
(1) North Carolina high school seniors. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per semester for up to eight semesters.twelve thousand dollars
($12,000) per academic year for up to four academic years.
(2) Students applying for transfer to a selected educator preparation program at
an institution of higher education. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per semester for up to six semesters.twelve thousand dollars
($12,000) per academic year for up to four academic years.
(3) Individuals currently holding a bachelor's degree seeking preparation for
teacher licensure. – Forgivable loans of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000)
per semester for up to four semesters.twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) per
academic year for up to two academic years.
(4) Students matriculating at institutions of higher education who are changing to
an approved program of study at a selected educator preparation program. –
Forgivable loans of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per semester for up
to four semesters.twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) per academic year for up
to four academic years.
Forgivable loans may be used for tuition, fees, room, board, the cost of books, and expenses
related to obtaining licensure.
…
"§ 116-209.63. Terms of forgivable loans; receipt and disbursement of funds.
…
(b) Forgiveness. – For every year a qualifying teacher remains a qualifying teacher, the
Authority shall forgive the loan amount received over one year of enrollment in an educator
preparation program and any interest accrued on that amount.
The Authority shall also forgive the loan if it finds that it is impossible for the recipient to
work for up to eight four years, within 10 years after completion of the program leading to teacher
licensure, at a North Carolina public school because of the death or permanent disability of the
recipient. If the recipient repays the forgivable loan by cash payments, all indebtedness shall be
House Bill 941-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
repaid within 10 years after completion of the program leading to teacher licensure supported by
the forgivable loan. If the recipient completes a program leading to teacher licensure, payment
of principal and interest shall begin no later than the first day of September after the completion
of the program. Should a recipient present extenuating circumstances, the Authority may extend
the period to repay the loan in cash to no more than a total of 12 years."

PART II. ADDITIONAL INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION
SECTION 2. For the initial selection of the additional four institutions of higher
education to be selected by the North Carolina Teaching Fellows Commission pursuant to
G.S. 116-209.62(f), as amended by Part I of this act, to participate in the Program, the
Commission shall ensure that the following additional criteria are met:
(1) Two of the additional four selected institutions shall be constituent institutions
of The University of North Carolina and two shall be private postsecondary
institutions operating in the State.
(2) The additional four selected institutions shall reflect a wider statewide
geographic diversity than the current participating institutions.

PART III. PRIOR TEACHING FELLOWS PROGRAM REVISIONS APPLY
RETROACTIVELY TO ALL TEACHING FELLOWS
SECTION 3.(a) Subsection (c) of Section 8A.4 of S.L. 2023-134 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 8A.4.(c) This section applies to applications for the award of funds beginning
in the 2024-2025 academic year.year for all persons participating in the Program, including
teachers who are continuing or entering service repayment beginning in the 2024-2025 academic
year."
SECTION 3.(b) Section 2.14(b) of S.L. 2024-1 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.14.(b) This section is effective July 1, 2023, and applies to applications for
the award of funds beginning in the 2024-2025 academic year.year for all persons participating
in the Program, including teachers who are continuing or entering service repayment beginning
in the 2024-2025 academic year."

PART IV. APPROPRIATION
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Teaching Fellows Program Trust Fund the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to revise the NC Teaching Fellows Program in accordance
with Part I of this act.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025. Except as otherwise provided,
this act applies beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year.
Page 4 House Bill 941-First Edition